Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5050YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2021 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 456A.39 Lifetime ginseng harvesting 1 permit for disabled veterans. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âDisabled veteranâ means a veteran who has been honorably 5 discharged from active military service in the armed forces of 6 the United States and who has a service-connected disability 7 rating of zero percent or higher as certified by the United 8 States department of veterans affairs. 9 b. âHarvest ginsengâ means the taking, possessing, and 10 selling of American ginseng pursuant to a program established 11 by the department under section 456A.24. 12 2. A resident of Iowa who is a disabled veteran may submit 13 an application the department for a lifetime ginseng harvesting 14 permit as provided in this section. 15 3. Upon application and payment of a one-time fee of seven 16 dollars and issuance of a lifetime ginseng harvesting permit 17 by the department, a disabled veteran shall be authorized 18 to harvest ginseng in accordance with applicable season 19 restrictions, quantity limits, and reporting requirements 20 established by the department. The permit shall be valid for 21 the lifetime of the permittee. 22 4. A lifetime ginseng harvesting permit issued under this 23 section shall be used in lieu of an annual ginseng harvesting 24 permit and shall be subject to the same rules and enforcement 25 provisions governing ginseng harvesting under this chapter and 26 chapter 481A. 27 5. The department shall prepare an application form and 28 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A as necessary to implement 29 this section. The department of veterans affairs shall assist 30 the department in verifying the status or claims of applicants 31 under this section. 32 6. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited 33 in the state fish and game protection fund established under 34 section 456A.17. 35 -1- LSB 5050YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2021